These terms tell you the rules for using our website at
www.geekymedics.com
and
app.geekymedics.com
(our site).
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://app.geekymedics.com/privacy/:
Login
Bundles
Compare Bundles
Clinical Skills Bundle
Knowledge Bundle
Knowledge & Skills Bundle
Data Interpretation Bundle
PLAB 1 & 2 Bundles
OSCE Guides
OSCE Stations
Virtual Patients
Questions & Cases
Free MCQs
UKMLA AKT Question Bank
PSA Question Bank
ECG Case Collection
ABG Case Collection
Blood Test Case Collection
Radiology Case Collection
Flashcards
Free Flashcards
OSCE Flashcards
Medicine Flashcards
Surgery Flashcards
Anatomy Flashcards
SCA Cases
OSCE books
Compare Books
Clinical Examination Book
OSCE Checklist Book
Login
Register
Privacy & Cookies Policy
By using the Geeky Medics platform, you are expressly accepting our privacy and cookies policy as set out below.
Geeky Medics Limited understands that your privacy is important to you and that you care about
                        how your personal data is used and shared online. We respect and value the privacy of everyone
                        who visits our websites
geekymedics.com
and
app.geekymedics.com
(“Our Site”) and will only
                        collect and use personal data in ways that are described here, and in a manner that is
                        consistent with Our obligations and your rights under the law.
Please read this Privacy and Cookies Policy carefully and ensure that you understand it. Your
                        acceptance of Our Privacy Policy is deemed to occur upon your first use of Our Site. If you do
                        not accept and agree with this Privacy Policy, you must stop using Our Site immediately.
1. Definitions and Interpretation
In this Policy, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
“Account” means an account required to access and/or use certain areas and features of Our Site;
“Cookie” means a small text file placed on your computer or device by Our Site when you visit certain parts of Our Site and/or when you use certain features of Our Site. Details of the Cookies used by Our Site are set out in section 13, below;
“Cookie Law” means the relevant parts of the Privacy and Electronic Communications (EC Directive) Regulations 2003;
“Personal data” means any and all data that relates to an identifiable person who can be directly or indirectly identified from that data. In this case, it means personal data that you give to Us via Our Site.
This definition shall, where applicable, incorporate the definitions provided in the Data Protection Act 1998 and/or EU Regulation 2016/679 – the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”); and
“We/Us/Our” means Geeky Medics Limited, a company incorporated and registered in England and Wales with company number 09523980 whose registered office is at Lytchett House, 13 Freeland Park, Wareham Road, Poole, Dorset, BH16 6FA.
2. Information About Us
2.1
. Our Site is owned and operated by Geeky Medics Limited of Lytchett House, 13 Freeland Park, Wareham Road, Poole, Dorset, BH16 6FA.
2.2
. You contact us by writing to us at the address above, or by emailing us at hey@geekymedics.com,
2.3
. Our Data Protection Officer is Dr Lewis Potter.
3. What Does This Policy Cover?
This Policy applies only to your use of Our Site. Our Site may contain links to other websites.
                            Please note that We have no control over how your data is collected, stored, or used by other
                            websites and We advise you to check the privacy policies of any such websites before providing
                            any data to them.
4. Your Rights
4.1
. As a data subject, you have the following rights under the GDPR, which this Policy and Our use of personal data have been designed to uphold:
4.1.1
. The right to be informed about Our collection and use of personal data;
4.1.2
. The right of access to the personal data We hold about you (see section 12);
4.1.3
. The right to rectification if any personal data We hold about you is inaccurate or incomplete (please contact Us using the details in section 2.2);
4.1.4
. The right to be forgotten – i.e. the right to ask Us to delete any personal data We hold about you. We only hold your personal data for a limited time, as explained in section 6 but if you would like Us to delete it sooner, please contact Us via the methods set out in section 2.2. You can also delete your Geeky Medics account at any time by clicking the 'delete account' button in the settings menu;
4.1.5
. The right to restrict (i.e. prevent) the processing of your personal data;
4.1.6
. The right to data portability (obtaining a copy of your personal data to re-use with another service or organisation);
4.1.7
. The right to object to Us using your personal data for particular purposes; and
4.1.8
. Rights with respect to automated decision making and profiling.
4.2
. If you have any cause for complaint about Our use of your personal data, please contact Us via the methods set out in section 2.2 and We will do Our best to solve the problem for you. If We are unable to help, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with the UK's supervisory authority, the Information Commissioner's Office.
4.3
. For further information about your rights, please contact the Information Commissioner's Office or your local Citizens Advice Bureau.
5. What Data Do We Collect?
Depending upon your use of Our Site, We may collect some or all of the following personal and non-personal data (please also see section 13 on Our use of Cookies and similar technologies):
5.1 Name
5.2 Address
5.3 Email address
5.4 County of residence
5.5 Educational background
5.6 Educational performance
5.7 IP address
5.8 Web browser type and version
5.9 Operating system
6. How Do We Use Your Data?
6.1
. All personal data is processed and stored securely, for no longer than is necessary in light of the reason(s) for which it was first collected. We will comply with Our obligations and safeguard your rights under the Data Protection Act 1998 or GDPR at all times. For more details on security see section 7, below.
6.2
. Our use of your personal data will always have a lawful basis, either because it is necessary for Our performance of a contract with you, because you have consented to Our use of your personal data (e.g. by subscribing to emails), or because it is in Our legitimate interests. Specifically, We may use your data for the following purposes:
6.2.1
. Providing and managing your Account;
6.2.2
. Providing and managing your access to Our Site;
6.2.3
. Personalising and tailoring your experience on Our Site;
6.2.4
. Supplying Our products and/or services to you (please note that We require your personal data in order to enter into a contract with you);
6.2.5
. Personalising and tailoring Our products and/or services for you;
6.2.6
. Replying to emails from you;
6.2.7
. Supplying you with emails that you have opted into (you may unsubscribe or opt-out at any time by clicking the unsubscribe link at the bottom of our emails);
6.2.8
. Market research
6.2.9
. Educational research
6.3
. With your permission and/or where permitted by law, We may also use your data for marketing purposes which may include contacting you by email and/or telephone or text message or by post with information, news and offers on Our products and/or our services. We will not, however, send you any unsolicited marketing or spam and will take all reasonable steps to ensure that We fully protect your rights and comply with Our obligations under the Data Protection Act 1998 or GDPR and the Privacy and Electronic Communications (EC Directive) Regulations 2003.
6.4
. You have the right to withdraw your consent to Us using your personal data at any time, and to request that We delete it.
6.5
. We do not keep your personal data for any longer than is necessary in light of the reason(s) for which it was first collected. Data will therefore be retained for the following periods (or its retention will be determined on the following bases):
6.5.1
. Data that could be used to personally identify you will be kept for as long as you have an active account registered with us to enable us to continue to provide you with our services.
7. How and Where Do We Store Your Data?
7.1
. We only keep your personal data for as long as We need to in order to use it as described above in section 6, and/or for as long as We have your permission to keep it.
7.2
. Some or all of your data may be stored outside of the European Economic Area (“the EEA”) (The EEA consists of all EU member states, plus Norway, Iceland, and Liechtenstein). If We do store data outside the EEA (this may be the case, for example, if Our email server is located in a country outside the EEA), We will take all reasonable steps to ensure that your data is treated as safely and securely as it would be within the UK and under the Data Protection Act 1998 and/or GDPR.
7.3
. Data security is very important to Us, and to protect your data We have taken suitable measures to safeguard and secure data collected through Our Site.
7.4
. Steps We take to secure and protect your data include:
7.4.1
. We store your data on a secure server managed by a GDPR compliant vendor.
7.4.2
. Any data transferred to and from the server is encrypted during transfer.
7.4.3
. Passwords are secured using the latest security algorithms and are not stored in plain text.
8. Do We Share Your Data?
8.1
. We may share anonymised aggregated data sets with third parties for research and marketing purposes.
8.2
. In certain circumstances, We may be legally required to share certain data held by Us, which may include your personal data, for example, where We are involved in legal proceedings, where We are complying with legal obligations, a court order, or a governmental authority.
8.3
. When using our artificial intelligence (AI) powered features, the content you type and audio you record is uploaded to the servers of OpenAI to be analysed so that a relevant response can be generated. This data is not used by the AI provider for any other purpose and is deleted from their servers within 30 days of being uploaded. We continue to store a text transcript of all virtual patient conversations on Our servers to enable users to review these transcripts at a later date and to facilitate our internal research and development.
8.4
. We use DigitalOcean for hosting our platform, where we store user names, email addresses, educational institution information, and passwords (encrypted using PBKDF2).
8.5
. We use Brevo for sending marketing emails, but only to users who have explicitly consented to receive such communications at signup.
8.6
. We use Crisp as our customer support platform, which stores user names, email addresses, and IP addresses to facilitate communication through our website's chat widget.
8.7
. For payment processing, we use:
Stripe for UK-based online sales
Paddle for international online sales
These payment processors store necessary user information including names, addresses, and payment details in accordance with their respective privacy policies.
8.8
. We use Sentry for debugging and error tracking purposes, which may collect relevant user names, email addresses, and IP addresses when errors occur to help us improve our platform.
9. What Happens If Our Business Changes Hands?
9.1
. We may, from time to time, expand or reduce Our business and this may involve the sale and/or the transfer of control of all or part of Our business. Any personal data that you have provided will, where it is relevant to any part of Our business that is being transferred, be transferred along with that part and the new owner or newly controlling party will, under the terms of this Privacy Policy, be permitted to use that data only for the same purposes for which it was originally collected by Us.
9.2
. In the event that any of your data is to be transferred in such a manner, you will not be contacted in advance and informed of the changes.
10. How Can You Control Your Data?
10.1
. In addition to your rights under the GDPR, set out in section 4, when you submit personal data via Our Site, you may be given options to restrict Our use of your data. In particular, We aim to give you strong controls on Our use of your data for direct marketing purposes (including the ability to opt-out of receiving emails from Us which you may do by unsubscribing using the links provided in Our emails.
10.2
. You may also wish to sign up to one or more of the preference services operating in the UK: The Telephone Preference Service (“the TPS”), the Corporate Telephone Preference Service (“the CTPS”), and the Mailing Preference Service (“the MPS”). These may help to prevent you receiving unsolicited marketing. Please note, however, that these services will not prevent you from receiving marketing communications that you have consented to receiving.
11. Your Right to Withhold Information
11.1
. You may access certain areas of Our Site without providing any data at all. However, to use all features and functions available on Our Site you may be required to submit or allow for the collection of certain data.
11.2
. You may restrict Our use of Cookies. For more information, see section 13.
12. How Can You Access Your Data?
You have the right to ask for a copy of any of your personal data held by Us (where such data is
                            held). We will provide any and all information in response to your request free of charge.
                            Please contact Us for more details at hey@geekymedics.com.
13. Our Use of Cookies
13.1
. Our website uses cookies to distinguish you from other users of our website. This helps us to provide you with a good experience when you browse our website and also allows us to improve our site. By continuing to browse the site, you are agreeing to our use of cookies.
13.2
. A cookie is a small file of letters and numbers that we store on your browser or the hard drive of your computer if you agree. Cookies contain information that is transferred to your computer's hard drive.
We use the following cookies:
Strictly necessary cookies. These are cookies that are required for the operation of our website. They include, for example, cookies that enable you to log into secure areas of our website, use a shopping cart or make use of e-billing services.
Analytical/performance cookies. They allow us to recognise and count the number of visitors and to see how visitors move around our website when they are using it. This helps us to improve the way our website works, for example, by ensuring that users are finding what they are looking for easily.
Functionality cookies. These are used to recognise you when you return to our website. This enables us to personalise our content for you, greet you by name and remember your preferences (for example, your choice of language or region).
Targeting cookies. These cookies record your visit to our website, the pages you have visited and the links you have followed. We will use this information to make our website and the advertising displayed on it more relevant to your interests. We may also share this information with third parties for this purpose.
13.3
. Please note that third parties (including, for example, advertising networks and providers of external services like web traffic analysis services) may also use cookies, over which we have no control. These cookies are likely to be analytical/performance cookies or targeting cookies.
13.4
. You block cookies by activating the setting on your browser that allows you to refuse the setting of all or some cookies. However, if you use your browser settings to block all cookies (including essential cookies) you may not be able to access all or parts of our site.
13.5
. Except for essential cookies, all cookies will expire after 2 years.
14. Artificial Intelligence Features
Geeky Medics provides some features which are powered by artificial intelligence, herein referred to as Geeky Medics AI.
You may provide input to be processed by Geeky Medics AI (“
Input
”), and receive output generated and returned by the Geeky Medics AI based on the Input (“
Output
”). Input and Output are your Content or Data, as applicable. You will ensure that your Input and use of Geeky Medics AI will not violate any applicable law. You are solely responsible for the development, content, operation, maintenance, and use of your Content and Data.
When using our artificial intelligence (AI) powered features, the content you type and audio you record is uploaded to the servers of OpenAI to be analysed so that a relevant response can be generated. This data is not used by the AI provider for any other purpose and is deleted from their servers within 30 days of being uploaded. We continue to store a text transcript of all virtual patient conversations on Our servers to enable users to review these transcripts at a later date and to facilitate our internal research and development.
You may not use Geeky Medics AI to develop foundation models or other large-scale models that compete with Geeky Medics AI or use the Services in a manner that violates any applicable laws or technical documentation, usage guidelines, or parameters; or process sensitive personal data as that term is understood under applicable data protection law. You acknowledge that due to the nature of machine learning and the technology powering Geeky Medics AI, Output may not be unique and the Services may generate the same or similar output to Geeky Medics or a third party.
Geeky Medics uses technology provided by OpenAI, LLC (“OpenAI”) to provide Geeky Medics AI. You may not use Geeky Medics AI in a manner that violates any OpenAI Policy, including their
Content Policy
;
Sharing and Publication Policy
; and
Community Guidelines
.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, Geeky Medics expressly disclaims all warranties and conditions of any kind, whether express or implied, including, but not limited to, those of merchantability, satisfactory quality, title, fitness for a particular purpose and non-infringement. Geeky Medics makes no warranty that any of the services will meet your requirements and/or that the services will be uninterrupted, timely, error-free or secure, nor does Geeky Medics make any warranty as to the results that may be obtained from the use of the Geeky Medics AI or the accuracy of any other information obtained through Geeky Medics AI. You understand and agree that any material and/or data obtained through the use of any of Geeky Medics AI is done at your sole risk. No information or advice, whether oral or written, obtained by you from Geeky Medics or through Geeky Medics AI shall create any warranty not expressly made herein. In no event shall Geeky Medics be liable for any indirect, special, consequential or incidental loss, exemplary or other damages related to these terms.
Changes To Our Policies
Any changes we make to our privacy or cookies policy in the future will be posted on this page
                            and, where appropriate, notified to you by e-mail. Please check back frequently to see any
                            updates or changes to our privacy policy.
Sub-policy 1
https://stripe.com/privacy:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connect
Platform Agreement
Account Agreement
Products and Programmes
Stripe Atlas
Stripe Adaptive Pricing
Stripe Climate
Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Corporate Card
Stripe Customer Portal
Stripe Data Pipeline
Stripe Financial Connections
Stripe Identity
Stripe Issuing
Stripe Tax
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Radar
Stripe Rewards
Stripe Verifications
Stripe Shop
Stripe Terminal
Terminal Purchase Terms
Terminal Reseller Terms
Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Treasury - Connected Accounts
Stripe Treasury - Platforms
Stripe Vault and Forward
Financial Services Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Stripe Payments Company
PNC Bank
Payment Method Terms
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Data Privacy Framework
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Licences
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 2
https://paddle.com/legal/#privacy:
Live masterclass
Web Revenue Labs: Take your Web2App performance to the next level
Save your seat
Terms
Paddle Master Services Agreement
Paddle.com Market Ltd.
Judd House
18-29 Mora Street
London
EC1V 8BT
United Kingdom
Paddle Payments Ltd.
The Academy
42 Pearse Street
Dublin, D02 YX88
Ireland
Paddle. com Inc.
3811 Ditmars Blvd
#1071 Astoria
New York, 11105-1803
USA
Last Updated: 17 February 2025
Acceptance of Terms
This Master Services Agreement, together with the Data Sharing Addendum which can be found at
paddle.com/legal/data-sharing-addendum
(or such other URLs that may be provided from time to time) and any Order Form, where applicable (collectively, the “
Agreement
”) govern the services provided to you (
"Supplier"
or
"you"
) by Paddle (as defined below)
By signing up for our services, or by downloading, installing or otherwise accessing or using the Services (as defined below), you agree that you have read, understand, and accept this Agreement, and you agree to be bound by the terms contained herein and all terms, policies and guidelines incorporated in the Agreement by reference (including the Privacy Policy which can be found at
https://paddle.com/privacy
(or such other URLs that Paddle may provide from time to time)).
If you do not agree to this Agreement, you do not have our permission to, and may not use the Services (as defined below) in any way. The Services are offered to you conditional on your acceptance of this Agreement.
We may make changes to this Agreement from time to time. When we do, we will revise the “Last Updated” date given above. Modifications are effective upon publication. It is your responsibility to review this Agreement frequently and to remain informed of any changes to them. The then-current version of this Agreement will supersede all earlier versions. You agree that your continued use of our Services after such changes have been published will constitute your acceptance of such revised Agreement. Disputes arising under this Agreement will be resolved in accordance with the version of these terms that was in effect at the time the dispute arose.
1 Definitions and Interpretation
1.1 In these Terms of Use, the following terms have the meanings this Section 1.1 ascribes those terms:
“Acceptable Use Policy”
means Paddle’s acceptable use policy set out in
https://paddle.com/support/aup/
(or such other URL that Paddle may provide from time to time);
"Affiliate Entity"
means being any corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other form of legal entity, which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by or is under joint control, from time to time;
“Additional Services”
means the services referred to in clause 4.3;
“Buyers”
means Checkout Buyers, Invoiced Businesses and Invoiced Consumers;
“Buyer Terms”
means the Checkout Buyer Terms, Invoicing Consumer Terms and Invoicing Business Terms;
"
Card"
means any form of credit card, debit card or pre-paid card issued by an Issuer under a Card Scheme;
"Card Scheme"
means Visa Inc, MasterCard Worldwide, Cartes Bancaires, JCB, American Express, Union Pay International, Diners Club International/Discover Network or comparable bodies which provide Cards and regulate Card acceptance and includes alternative payment methods and schemes such as PayPal;
"
Chargeback
" means a transaction which is successfully charged back or reversed, in whole or part on the request of a Checkout Buyer or a payment method provider pursuant to the relevant Payment Scheme Rules and may or may not incur a charge;
“Checkout Buyer”
means an end customer who purchases the Product using the Paddle Checkout;
“Checkout Buyer Terms”
means the terms set out in
paddle.com/legal/checkout-buyer-terms
(or such other URL that Paddle may provide from time to time) which apply to Checkout Buyers;
“Checkout Recovery”
means the Additional Service offered by Paddle through which Paddle emails a prospective Buyer if they have commenced but not completed the purchase of a Product;
"Confidential Information"
means information, whether written or oral, in any form, including without limitation, information relating to the development, products, trade secrets, business plans, suppliers, customers, finances, personnel data, and other material or information considered proprietary by the disclosing party;
"Controller"
means a "controller" as that term is defined in the UK GDPR;
"Data Protection Legislation"
means all applicable data protection and privacy legislation in force from time to time in the UK including the General Data Protection Regulation ((EU) 2016/679); the Data Protection Act 2018; the Privacy and Electronic Communications Directive 2002/58/EC (as updated by Directive 2009/136/EC) and the Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (SI 2003 No. 2426) as amended UK General Data Protection Regulation 2016/679, as implemented by the Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments etc) (EU Exit) Regulations 2019 and the Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments etc) (EU Exit) Regulations 2020 (the "UK GDPR"), any other European Union legislation relating to personal data and all other legislation and regulatory requirements in force from time to time which apply to a party relating to the use of Personal Data (including, without limitation, the privacy of electronic communications); and the guidance and codes of practice issued by the relevant data protection or supervisory authority and applicable to a party, including the Information Commissioner's Data Sharing Code of Practice 2020;
“Data Sharing Addendum”
means Paddle’s data sharing terms, set out at
paddle.com/legal/data-sharing-addendum
(or such other URL that Paddle may provide from time to time) that governs the sharing of personal data between Paddle and Supplier in accordance with the Data Protection Legislation;
"Intellectual Property Rights"
means patents, rights to inventions, copyright and neighbouring and related rights, moral rights, trade marks and service marks, business names and domain names, rights in get-up and trade dress, goodwill and the right to sue for passing off or unfair competition, rights in designs, rights in computer software, database rights, rights to use, and protect the confidentiality of, confidential information (including know-how and trade secrets), and all other intellectual property rights, in each case whether registered or unregistered and including all applications and rights to apply for and be granted, renewals or extensions of, and rights to claim priority from, such rights and all similar or equivalent rights or forms of protection which subsist or will subsist now or in the future in any part of the world;
“Invoiced Business”
means an end customer who is purchasing the Product using Paddle Invoicing in connection with their trade, business, craft or profession;
“Invoicing Business Terms”
means the terms set out in
paddle.com/legal/invoiced-business-terms
(or such other URL that Paddle may provide from time to time) which apply to Invoiced Businesses;
“Invoiced Consumer”
means an end customer who is purchasing the Product using Paddle Invoicing wholly or mainly for their personal use;
“Invoicing Consumer Terms
” means the terms set out in
paddle.com/legal/invoiced-consumer-terms
(or such other URL that Paddle may provide from time to time) which apply to Invoiced Consumers;
"
Paddle"
means for sales to Buyers based in the United States: Paddle.com Inc.; and for sales to the rest of the world: Paddle Payments Limited (for Suppliers based in the United Kingdom for VAT purposes) or Paddle.com Market Limited (for all other Suppliers);
“Paddle Checkout”
means the online checkout that Checkout Buyers use to purchase the Product, and includes payment methods such as credit card, PayPal, alternative payment methods and bank transfer;
"Paddle Discount"
means the margin payable to Paddle for Services in respect of each resale of a Product made by Paddle;
“Paddle Invoicing”
means Paddle invoicing Invoiced Businesses and Invoiced Consumers for the Product and collecting payment in full, by bank transfer or other agreed payment method;
“Payment Currency”
means the currency which you select for you Supplier Account, being USD, EUR, GBP, CAD or AUD;
"Payment Scheme Rules"
means the collective set of by-laws, rules, regulations, operating regulations, procedures and/or waivers issued by the Card Schemes, as amended and/or supplemented from time to time;
"Product"
means the Supplier's software product(s) and/or digital content agreed to be resold and distributed, and any subsequent updates and upgrades thereto and includes any associated integration or implementation costs and / or service fees;
“Sales Tax”
means any tax or levy chargeable or withheld on the Transaction globally, including but not limited to VAT, GST, Sales Tax and Sales & Use Tax, Digital Service Tax or Levy, and Corporate Withholding Taxes;
"Services"
means the services provided by Paddle as further described in clause 3;
“SRP”
means the price paid by the Buyer for the Product, as recommended by the Supplier in the Supplier Dashboard;
“Supplier Account”
means the account you will set up on the Paddle platform in order to be able to use the Services;
“Supplier Dashboard”
means the dashboard found at
vendors.paddle.com/
(or such other URL that Paddle may provide from time to time) where you are able to access your Supplier Account, view confirmed sales, amend account settings and access all reports;
“Supplier Fee”
shall have the meaning set out in clause 4.1;
“Supplier URL(s)”
means the address of any websites and/or mobile applications owned and operated by the Supplier where the Product will be sold using the Services, the initial Supplier URL(s) being those which have been listed by the Supplier as part of its onboarding process with Paddle, together with any future Supplier URL(s) approved by Paddle, in each case as recorded in the Supplier Dashboard, from time to time;
“Trademarks”
means your trademarks, service marks, trade names and logotypes whether registered or otherwise;
“Transaction”
means a completed sale of the Product (excluding reversals, refunds and other Chargebacks) via Paddle Checkout or Paddle Invoicing;
"Transaction Currency"
means the currency in which the Product is sold to the Buyers; and
1.2 In this Agreement, unless the context requires otherwise:
(i) any clause, schedule or other headings in this Agreement is included for convenience only and shall have no effect on the interpretation of the Agreement;
(ii) a reference to a ‘party’ includes that party’s personal representatives, successors and permitted assigns;
(iii) a reference to a ‘person’ includes a natural person, corporate or unincorporated body (in each case whether or not having separate legal personality) and that person’s personal representatives, successors and permitted assigns;
(iv) a reference to a ’company’ includes any company, corporation or other body corporate, wherever and however incorporated or established;
(v) a reference to a gender includes each other gender;
(vi) words in the singular include the plural and vice versa;
(vii) any words that follow 'include', 'includes', 'including', ‘in particular’ or any similar words and expressions shall be construed as illustrative only and shall not limit the sense of any word, phrase, term, definition or description preceding those words;
(viii) a reference to ‘writing’ or ‘written’ includes any method of reproducing words in a legible and non-transitory form (including email);
(ix) a reference to legislation is a reference to that legislation as amended, extended, re-enacted or consolidated from time to time;
(x) a reference to legislation is a reference to such legislation as amended or re-enacted includes all subordinate legislation made from time to time under that legislation as amended or re-enacted.
2. Appointment
2.1 You appoint Paddle as your non-exclusive reseller of the Product across all territories and will ensure that Paddle’s status as reseller is reflected on your website in a form agreed with Paddle.
2.2. You acknowledge and agree that as Paddle is the seller of the Product to the Buyer, you shall not issue any invoice or make any demand for payment to any Buyer in a Transaction. If you agree with the Buyer to issue a refund or repay any of the SRP you will not make this payment directly to the Buyer but will inform Paddle of what you have agreed and Paddle will make the relevant refund.
3. Services
3.1 In respect of its appointment as a reseller, Paddle will provide the following Services:
(i) setting you up as a supplier of the Product on Paddle's platform and establishing a Supplier Account which provides you with access to the Supplier Dashboard and allows you to view all sales made by Paddle and the monies which are due to you for sales of the Product by Paddle;
(ii) acting as your non-exclusive reseller of the Product via Paddle Checkout and/or Paddle Invoicing across all territories supported by Paddle from time to time during the term of the Agreement (for the avoidance of doubt nothing in this Agreement creates an obligation for Paddle to sell across all territories); and
(iii) Facilitating product fulfilment by you to Buyers through connecting you to Buyers to enable such Buyer to download / access the Product, as applicable; and
(iv) Order support and being responsible for all aspects of Sales Tax as between you, Paddle and Buyers.
3.2 From time to time, you may choose to activate optional Additional Services. The Additional Services may be activated via the Supplier Dashboard.
4. Paddle Discount
4.1 For each Transaction, Paddle shall pay the Supplier the SRP less:
(i) any Sales Tax due or incurred;
(ii) the Paddle Discount; and
(iii) any other charges payable by you pursuant to this Agreement.
such amount being the "Supplier Fee"
4.2 The Paddle Discount shall be calculated as follows:
(i) Paddle Checkout: 5% of SRP plus $0.50;
(ii) Paddle Invoicing (where payment is made by bank transfer): 3.5% of SRP.
For the avoidance of doubt, the Paddle Discount applicable to Paddle Checkout set out in clause 4.2 (i) above shall be applied where the Invoiced Business or Invoiced Consumer is redirected back to the Paddle Checkout (credit card, PayPal or an alternative payment method).
4.3 Charges for Additional Services are as follows (such charges being added to and forming part of the Paddle Discount):
(i) Checkout Recovery: 10% of each checkout successfully recovered;
4.4. As Merchant of Record, Paddle reserves the right to set the price or licence fee at which the Product is offered for sale to Buyers.
5. Sales Tax and Withholding
Paddle is the reseller of the Product. This structure allows Paddle to handle all Sales Tax collection, reporting and remittance. If required to by law Paddle will withhold any and all required taxes, fees and other such amounts from sales proceeds of the Product.
6. Title and Licence Grant
6.1 We grant you a non-exclusive and non-transferable right and licence during the term of this Agreement to access and use the Supplier Dashboard and Supplier Account solely to the extent necessary to receive the Services and perform your obligations under the Agreement. We grant you a non-exclusive and non-transferable right and licence during the term of this Agreement to place the then-current Paddle Trademark or logo on your website for the purposes of the Paddle Checkout, provided that at all times you comply with any brand guidelines made available to you by or on behalf of Paddle with respect to such use.
6.2 You hereby grant to Paddle a non-exclusive and non-transferable right and licence during the term of this Agreement to sell directly and facilitate access to the Product to Buyers;
6.3 Paddle agrees not to:
(i) modify the Product or create derivative works thereof;
(ii) merge the Product with other software or services;
(iii) reverse engineer, decompile, disassemble, or otherwise attempt to derive the source code (if applicable) for the Product;
(iv) disclose to third parties the results of any benchmarking tests performed on the Product without your prior written consent (if applicable); or
(v) otherwise use, copy or distribute the Product except as expressly allowed hereunder.
6.4 You hereby grant to Paddle a non-transferable (except in connection with an assignment of this Agreement), non-exclusive right to use the Trademarks in order to provide the Services and undertake to indemnify Paddle from and against any claim that our proper use of the Trademarks under such licence infringes any third party rights. Paddle shall not attach any additional trademarks, service marks, or trade names to any Product and shall not use the Trademarks as part of its own trademarks, service marks or trade names or in any other manner that would tend to imply that Paddle has an affiliation with you other than as set forth in this Agreement.
6.5 Other than expressly provided for in this clause 6, you and your licensees retain ownership of all right, title and interest in and to the Product, any related documentation and Trademarks, and all Intellectual Property Rights therein, and Paddle shall acquire no rights therein except as expressly set forth in the Agreement. You will own all rights, title and interest in all developments of and enhancements to the Product. Paddle will take no action which may adversely affect or impair your ownership of such materials and rights.
7. Transaction and After Sales Support
7.1 Paddle agrees to provide first tier after-sales support to Buyers. First tier after-sales support is limited to invoicing, handling requests for refunds, payment, reconciliation and initial order related support.
7.2 Paddle shall maintain PCI certification during the term of this Agreement and will notify Supplier without undue delay if it fails to be certified during this time. Should Paddle fail to maintain its PCI certification during the term, Supplier at its sole option choose to suspend all activities under the Agreement until Paddle becomes certified or terminate the Agreement with immediate effect.
7.3 You warrant that you will provide any additional ongoing customer service and after-sales support in respect of the Product including but not limited to technical and/or delivery level support (e.g. Service Level Agreements) in accordance with the terms agreed between you and each Buyer.
8. Fees and Charges
8.1 Paddle will report to you in the Payment Currency, however you will be able to access data on individual resales of Products in the currency used by the Buyer. If a sale requires currency conversion into the Payment Currency, Paddle will convert the amount at the mid-market rate provided by Open Exchange Rates at the time the payment is received from the Buyer plus a foreign exchange margin of 2% for major currencies (USD / EUR / GBP), 2.5% for CZK, DKK, NOK and THB, and 3% for all other currencies.
8.2 The number and value of confirmed sales will be provided to the Supplier via the Supplier Dashboard. Provided the Supplier Fee accrued during each month is above $100, €100 or £100 (or some higher amount as agreed between you and Paddle) Paddle shall pay the Supplier Fee to you on or before the 15th of the following month provided that you have provided Paddle with all relevant information required to process a payment to you. Paddle reserves the right to delegate the responsibility for self billing arrangements and to make payment under this Agreement to an Affiliate Entity.
8.3 If you are VAT registered in the European Union, you agree to inform Paddle if you stop being registered for VAT, get a new VAT registration number or transfer your business as a going concern.
8.4 Where possible, Paddle will make international transfers through our local ACH network and there will be no charge to you for such transfers. We are not responsible for any charges associated with the making of transfers via international bank transfer or through PayPal. A charge of $15 will be payable by you for each international bank transfer (€15 if your Payment Currency is EUR or £15 if your Payment Currency is GBP). If you opt to receive payment in a currency different to the Payment Currency, then we reserve the right to charge a conversion margin of up to 1.5%. We will go to all reasonable efforts to ensure no additional fees are charged, but are not responsible for any charges that do occur.
8.5 If Paddle refunds a Buyer (including, but not limited to, through a Chargeback), Paddle is entitled to receive from you the amount of the refund or Chargeback, as well as charges and fees of up to either 20 GBP, USD or EUR, or 40 AUD or CAD depending on the Transaction Currency (if the Transaction Currency is any other currency, this will be based on the Payment Currency). Paddle reserves the right to suspend all Services until the deficit is paid by you.
8.6 Where any credit is due to an Invoiced Business or Invoiced Consumer due to service level or similar failures in the provision of the Product by you, no credit will be given to you for any previously applied Paddle Discount and the Paddle Discount will be applied to the gross amount of any amounts invoiced prior to deduction of any service level or similar credit.
9. Set Off
9.1 Without prejudice to any other rights or remedies we may have, the Supplier hereby authorises us to set-off by whatever means the whole or any part of the Supplier's liability to us under this Agreement against any funds, sums or other amounts owing to, the Supplier under this Agreement including but not limited to:
(i) liability for refunds and Chargebacks;
(ii) any fines issued for non compliance with the Payment Scheme Rules;
(iii) breach of our Acceptable Use Policy;
(iv) fraudulent or illegal use of our Services; or
(v) other liabilities as set out in this Agreement.
9.2 You agree that we may exercise the right of set-off in clause 9.1 at any time, without further notice to you whether your liability is present or future, liquidated or unliquidated, actual or contingent. If the liability to be set off is expressed in different currencies, we may convert such liability at a market rate of exchange for the purpose of set-off. In the event such set-off does not fully reimburse us for the liability owed, you shall immediately pay us a sum equal to any shortfall.
9.3 If there are insufficient funds, in Paddle’s sole discretion at any time to cover potential refunds, Chargebacks, charges against the Supplier Account or other liabilities you may owe to us ("
Liabilities
"), you agree to either put Paddle in sufficient funds or agree that we may exercise the right of set-off in clause 9.1 at any time without notice to the Supplier whether such liability is present or future, liquidated or unliquidated, actual or contingent. If the liability to be set off is expressed in different currencies, we may convert such liability at a market rate of exchange for the purpose of set-off. In the event such set-off does not fully reimburse us for the liability owed, the Supplier shall immediately pay us a sum equal to any shortfall.
9.4 For the avoidance of doubt, Paddle is not obliged to pay any Supplier Fees associated with activities or Products which it considers in its sole discretion to be fraudulent or illegal under any relevant law or regulation. We may suspend your Supplier Account and retain any Supplier Fees, or terminate this Agreement, if
(i) we determine in our sole discretion that you are ineligible for the Services because of significant fraud risk, or any other risk of illegal activity associated with your Supplier Account;
(ii) we determine in our sole discretion that you have intentionally or wilfully taken any action which directly defrauds a Buyer;
(iii) any Law or Payment Scheme Rules requires us to do so; or
(iv) we are otherwise entitled to do so under this Agreement.
10. Supplier Obligations
10.1 The Supplier warrants that, before entering into this Agreement and thereafter on our request, provide information about itself and its business which may include information about its financial status and creditworthiness, its activities, its shareholders (and ultimate beneficial owners), the Products and Supplier URLs, as we or our third party KYC verification partners request from time to time (the "
Supplier Information
"). The Supplier represents and warrants unconditionally that all Supplier Information it provides to us is correct and up to date and undertakes to provide us with at least five (5) Business Days' prior written notice of any material change to any of the Supplier Information.
10.2 If the Supplier fails to provide the Supplier Information requested in accordance with clause 10.1, we reserve the right to suspend the provision of our Services until such Supplier Information is provided.
10.3 The Supplier shall provide correct and complete Supplier URL(s) to us. The Supplier may, subject to our prior written approval, amend its existing Supplier URL(s) or add new Supplier URL(s) from time to time, in which case the same obligations as apply to existing Supplier URL(s) shall apply to such amended or additional Supplier URL(s).
10.4 The Supplier is responsible for correctly entering all information into the Supplier Account and Supplier Dashboard.
11. Representations and Warranties
11.1 You represent and warrant to Paddle that:
(i) the information you have provided on the Supplier Dashboard is accurate and up to date;
(ii) the information you have provided in respect of the Product or type or category of Product is correct and up to date;
(iii) you are the owner of each Product or that you are legally authorised to act on behalf of the owner of such Product for the purposes of the Agreement;
(iv) the Product complies with our Acceptable Use Policy and the sale of the Product is in compliance with all Payment Scheme Rules and applicable laws and you shall provide Buyers with access to Paddle’s after sales support in a manner as it is required by the applicable law in the countries where the Buyers are based, including by way of a direct link to enable cancellation of a Product, if it is required;
(v) you own and operate the Supplier URL(s) listed in your application for a Supplier Account and/or as otherwise approved by Paddle from time to time;
(vi) you will not use the Services to facilitate the sale of Products on websites or applications other than the Supplier URL(s);
(vii) the Product is free from defects and fit for any purpose agreed between you and the Buyer or otherwise fit for any purpose for which such Product is generally used;
(viii) you have the necessary right, power and authority to enter into this Agreement and to perform the acts required of you hereunder and to permit Paddle to perform the Services contemplated under the Agreement;
(ix) there is no action, suit or proceeding at law or in equity now pending or, to your knowledge, threatened by or against or affecting you which would substantially impair your right to carry on your business as contemplated herein or adversely affect your financial condition or operations;
(x) your use of the Services and the delivery and performance by you of your obligations under the Agreement do not and will not conflict with or violate any agreement or other instrument with a third party applicable to you or otherwise infringe upon the rights of any third party (including Intellectual Property Rights);
(xi) you have complied and will continue to comply with all applicable laws, statutes, ordinances, and regulations (including, without limitation, any relevant data protection or privacy laws);
(xii) you will not use the Services or any part thereof, including for the avoidance of doubt the Paddle Checkout, to conceal information required under applicable law from, or otherwise mislead, a Buyer;
(xiii) you will not reverse engineer, decompile, disassemble, or otherwise attempt to derive the source code (if applicable) for any aspect of the Services or the Paddle Checkout; and
(xiv) you will at all times comply with all applicable Paddle policies and the Data Sharing Addendum.
11.2 You agree to indemnify, defend and hold harmless Paddle, its employees, officers and directors, or users from and against any and all claims, liabilities, penalties, settlements, judgments, fees (including reasonable legal fees) arising from or in relation to:
(i) any information that you or anyone using your Supplier Account may submit or access in the course of using the Services, including Supplier Information;
(ii) your breach of any representation or warranty in, or violation of the terms of the Agreement or any agreement or other instrument with a third party applicable to you;
(iii) any violation or failure by you to comply with all laws and regulations in connection with your use of the Services, whether or not described herein; and
(iv) any disputes in respect of the Product.
12. Disclaimer of Warranties and Limitation of Liability
12.1 Paddle disclaims any and all warranties, representations and conditions, whether express, implied or statutory regarding the services to the full extent permitted by law. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the services are provided "as-is" and without warranties of any kind, including, without limitation, any warranties of performance or implied warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, title and non-infringement. Further, Paddle does not make, and has not made, any representation or warranty that the Services are accurate, complete, reliable, current, error-free, or virus-free or that the operation of the Services will be uninterrupted. Some jurisdictions do not allow exclusion of an implied warranty, so this disclaimer may not apply to you.
12.2 To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, in no event will Paddle, its partners, service providers, affiliates or any of their respective directors, officers, employees or agents be liable to the other party for any special, incidental, indirect, punitive, exemplary or consequential damages, whether foreseeable or unforeseeable, which may arise out of or in connection with this Agreement, regardless of whether either party has been apprised of the possibility or likelihood of such damages occurring, or whether claims are based or remedies are sought in contract or tort otherwise.
12.3 Paddle's aggregate liability, howsoever arising and whether in tort (including for negligence or breach of statutory duty), contract, misrepresentation, restitution or otherwise, under the Agreement shall not exceed $50,000.
12.4 Notwithstanding the foregoing, neither party limits its liability in respect of (i) fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; (ii) death or personal injury caused by negligence; (iii) a breach of any obligations implied by section 12 of the Sale of Goods Act 1979 or section 2 of the Supply of Goods and Services Act 1982; or (iv) any matter for which it would be unlawful for the parties to exclude liability.
13. Confidentiality
13.1 The parties acknowledge that they may share Confidential Information for the purposes of this Agreement. The receiving party shall not use, disclose, or otherwise take any advantage of such Confidential Information, except as expressly permitted in the Agreement.
13.2 Each party shall exercise the same degree of care to avoid the publication or dissemination of the other party's Confidential Information as it affords to its own Confidential Information of a similar nature which it desires not to be published or disseminated, which in any event shall not be less than reasonable care.
13.3 Confidential Information disclosed under the Agreement shall only be used by the receiving party for the purpose of the Agreement or the performance of its obligations hereunder. The receiving party agrees not to use the disclosing party’s Confidential Information for its own benefit or for the benefit of any third party.
13.4 The obligation of the parties not to disclose confidential information shall survive the termination or expiry of the Agreement.
13.5 Notwithstanding the foregoing, neither party shall be obliged to protect Confidential Information of the other party which:
(i) is rightfully received by the receiving party from another party without confidential obligation to such party, or
(ii) is known to or developed by the receiving party independently without use of the Confidential Information, or
(iii) is, or becomes generally known to the public by other than a breach of duty hereunder by the receiving party; and
13.6 A receiving party may disclose Confidential Information that is required to be disclosed pursuant to a requirement of a government agency or law so long as the receiving party provides prompt notice to the disclosing party of such requirement prior to disclosure (where permitted under applicable law).
14. Privacy
14.1 The parties consider that data sharing is necessary in order to fulfil the provision of the Services, including the sale of the Product, under the Agreement.
14.2 The Parties acknowledge that each party acts as an independent Controller, and each party agrees that it shall at all times during the term of the Agreement, comply with the Data Protection Laws and the terms of the Data Sharing Addendum.
14.3 Paddle will maintain appropriate administrative, physical, and technical safeguards for protection of the security, confidentiality and integrity of the Personal Data of Buyers and your data, as described in our Privacy Policy which can be found at
https://paddle.com/privacy
(or such other URL that Paddle may provide from time to time).
15. Dormant accounts
Where you have no sales for a period of six (6) consecutive months (the
“Dormancy Period”
) and there is an outstanding Supplier Fee due to you, Paddle reserves the right to charge you an account dormancy charge ("
Dormancy Charge"
) and/or deactivate your Supplier Account. Dormant Supplier Accounts with a negative balance and no sales activity in the preceding fifteen (15) days will be deactivated immediately. Following a Dormancy Period, Paddle may revoke access to the Supplier Account without notice to you.
16. Termination
16.1 Either party may terminate this Agreement at any time by giving the other party at least 30 days’ prior notice in writing.
16.2 Either party may terminate this Agreement by immediate notice in writing to the other if:
(i) the other commits a material breach of its obligations under the Agreement, including for the avoidance of doubt compliance with the Acceptable Use Policy, and such breach is not remediable;
(ii) the other commits a material breach of its obligation under the Agreement which is not remedied within 14 days of receiving written notice of such breach;
(iii) any consent, licence or authorisation held by the other is revoked or modified such that the other is no longer able to comply with its obligations under the Agreement or receive any benefit to which it is entitled;
(iv) the other stops carrying on all or a significant part of its business, or indicates in any way that it intends to do so, or is unable to pay its debts (within the meaning of section 123 of the Insolvency Act 1986) or becomes insolvent or an order is made or a resolution passed for the administration, winding-up or dissolution of the other (otherwise than for the purposes of a solvent amalgamation or reconstruction) or an administrative or other receiver, manager, liquidator, administrator, trustee or similar officer is appointed over all or any substantial part of the assets of the other or the other enters into or proposes any composition or arrangement with its creditors generally or any analogous event occurs in any applicable jurisdiction, unless such termination is not lawful under applicable law.
16.3 Paddle may terminate this Agreement by immediate notice in writing to you if:
(i) it is requested by any of its payment method providers;
(ii) there is any suspected fraudulent/ criminal activity or non compliance by the Supplier of applicable laws or Payment Scheme Rules;
(iii) where the Product has a chargeback rate which is in excess of the upper limit set by the Card Schemes from time to time; or
(iv) where Supplier commits a material breach of the Acceptable Use Policy.
16.4 Termination or expiry of this Agreement shall not affect any accrued rights and liabilities of either party at any time up to the date of termination.
17. Rights and Obligations on Termination or Expiration
17.1 Termination or expiration of this Agreement shall not release either party from the obligation to make payment of all amounts then or thereafter due and payable. For the avoidance of doubt, Paddle may retain any Supplier Fees as it reasonably determines necessary to settle any outstanding liabilities under this Agreement.
17.2 Upon termination or expiration of the Agreement, Paddle will within thirty (30) days return to you or destroy (i) all access details to the Product; (ii) all manuals, documentation, product literature, fee schedules and other written materials provided by you; or (iii) all Confidential Information and other property of you, provided that such materials or information are in its possession or under its control, unless required to retain the data to comply with or demonstrate compliance with a legal obligation.
17.3 Upon termination of the Agreement Paddle shall, upon request by the Supplier, assign all contracts for the sale of the Product with the Buyer to you, in accordance with the Buyer Terms. In the event that Paddle is unable to assign the Buyer Terms to you by operation of applicable law or due to the circumstances in clauses 16.2(iii), 16.2(iv) or 16.3, Paddle may terminate the Buyer Terms with any Buyer in respect of any Product which has an active subscription and shall refund the Buyer the pro-rated purchase price. This Agreement shall continue in respect of any Product which a Buyer has purchased prior to the date of termination or expiry and which Paddle chooses not to terminate.
18. General
18.1 The parties agree that this Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between them and supersedes all previous agreements, understandings and arrangements between them, whether in writing or oral in respect of its subject matter.
18.2 Each party acknowledges that it has not entered into this Agreement in reliance on, and shall have no remedies in respect of, any representation or warranty that is not expressly set out in the Agreement. No party shall have any claim for innocent or negligent misrepresentation on the basis of any statement in this Agreement.
18.3 You may not assign, subcontract or encumber any right or obligation under this Agreement, in whole or in part, without Paddle's prior written consent, such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed. Any assignment in violation of this Clause 18.3 is void.
18.4 A party shall not be in breach of the Agreement nor liable for delay in performing, or failure to perform, any of its obligations under this Agreement if such delay or failure result from an event, circumstance or cause beyond a party’s reasonable control. In such circumstances the affected party shall be entitled to a reasonable extension of the time for performing such obligations.
18.5 Unless otherwise expressly agreed, no delay, act or omission by either party in exercising any right or remedy will be deemed a waiver of that, or any other, right or remedy.
18.6 Except as expressly provided in this Agreement, the rights and remedies provided under the Agreement are in addition to, and not exclusive of, any rights or remedies provided by law.
18.7 If any provision or part-provision of the Agreement is or becomes invalid, illegal or unenforceable, it shall be deemed modified to the minimum extent necessary to make it valid, legal and enforceable. If such modification is not possible, the relevant provision or part-provision shall be deemed deleted. Any modification to or deletion of a provision or part-provision under this clause shall not affect the validity and enforceability of the rest of the Agreement.
18.8 Each party shall comply with all laws, enactments, regulations, regulatory policies, guidelines and industry codes applicable to it and shall maintain such authorisations and all other approvals, permits and authorities as are required from time to time to perform its obligations under or in connection with this Agreement.
18.9 The parties are independent businesses and not partners, principal and agent, or employer and employee, or in any other relationship of trust to each other.
18.10 Any notice (save for notices given in legal proceedings or arbitration) given to a party under or in connection with this Agreement shall be in writing or by email to the address given for the relevant party herein or such other address that a party notifies the other party of at any time and shall be given and deemed received by first class post on the second Business Day after postage or, if given by hand on delivery. Paddle's email address for such purposes is legal@paddle.com and the Supplier's email address is as provided in the Supplier Account.
19. Governing Law and Jurisdiction
This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the law of England and the parties irrevocably agree that the English courts shall have exclusive jurisdiction over any claim or matter arising under or in connection with this Agreement.